District of Columbia statutes.
7-531.09

Qualified immunity.

With respect to their participation in the program or a demonstration project, the District government and its agencies, officials, and employees and sponsors and their advisory committees, officials, and employees shall be immune from civil or criminal liability if they have acted in good faith. This immunity shall not apply to volunteers.

History

Sept. 13, 1986, D.C. Law 6-143, § 10, 33 DCR 4372

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2249.